New Jersey, session 222, A4249.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: "Long-term care facility" means a nursing home, assisted living residence, comprehensive personal care home, residential health care facility, or dementia care home licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.). "Proxy directive" means a written document, executed in accordance with applicable law, which designates an adult with decision-making capacity to act as the declarants representative in the event that the declarant is determined by a court or authorized practitioner to lack decision-making capacity following the execution of the written document. b.    A long-term care facility shall meet with each resident at least once annually to determine whether the residents proxy directive, if any, is accurate and current. c.     Nothing in this section shall be deemed to require a long-term care facility resident to execute or maintain a proxy directive. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.